District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.07

Distribution of assets in winding up limited cooperative association.

(a)

In winding up a limited cooperative association’s activities and affairs, the association shall apply its assets to discharge its obligations to creditors, including members that are creditors. The association shall apply any remaining assets to pay, in money, the net amount distributable to members in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

(1)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, for the purposes of this subsection, the term “financial interests” means the amounts recorded in the names of members in the records of a limited cooperative association at the time a distribution is made, including amounts paid to become a member, amounts allocated but not distributed to members, and amounts of distributions authorized but not yet paid to members.

(2)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, each member shall be entitled to a distribution from the association of any remaining assets in the proportion of the member’s financial interests to the total financial interests of the members after all other obligations are satisfied.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(8)(B), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1010.07 and § 29-1012.06.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “business” in (a).

Effect of Amendments

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1207 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.